Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA RARE DISEASE ADVISORY COUNCIL.new text end new text begin $342,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $342,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Minnesota Rare Disease Advisory Council for purposes of Minnesota Statutes, section 256.4835. new text end